Ohio, session 136, HB632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4507.01, 4507.06, 4507.13, 4507.51, and 4507.52 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4507.01. (A) As used in this chapter, "motor vehicle," "motorized bicycle," "state," "owner," "operator," "chauffeur," and "highways" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. "Driver's license" means a class D license issued to any person to operate a motor vehicle or motor-driven cycle, other than a commercial motor vehicle, and includes "probationary license," "restricted license," "limited term license," and any operator's or chauffeur's license issued before January 1, 1990. "Probationary license" means the license issued to any person between sixteen and eighteen years of age to operate a motor vehicle. "Restricted license" means the license issued to any person to operate a motor vehicle subject to conditions or restrictions imposed by the registrar of motor vehicles. "Commercial driver's license" means the license issued to a person under Chapter 4506. of the Revised Code to operate a commercial motor vehicle. "Commercial motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4506.01 of the Revised Code. "Motorcycle operator's temporary instruction permit, license, or endorsement" includes a temporary instruction permit, license, or endorsement for a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter unless otherwise specified. "Motorized bicycle license" means the license issued under section 4511.521 of the Revised Code to any person to operate a motorized bicycle including a "probationary motorized bicycle license." "Probationary motorized bicycle license" means the license issued under section 4511.521 of the Revised Code to any person between fourteen and sixteen years of age to operate a motorized bicycle. "Identification card" means a card issued under sections 4507.50 to 4507.52 of the Revised Code. "Resident" means a person who, in accordance with standards prescribed in rules adopted by the registrar, resides in this state on a permanent basis. "Temporary resident" means a person who, in accordance with standards prescribed in rules adopted by the registrar, resides in this state on a temporary basis. "Gold star family member" means any member of the immediate family, as defined in section 4503.546 of the Revised Code, of a person who died in a combat zone while a member of any branch of the armed forces of the United States. (B) In the administration of this chapter and Chapter 4506. of the Revised Code, the registrar has the same authority as is conferred on the registrar by section 4501.02 of the Revised Code. Any act of an authorized deputy registrar of motor vehicles under direction of the registrar is deemed the act of the registrar. To carry out this chapter, the registrar shall appoint such deputy registrars in each county as are necessary. The registrar also shall provide at each place where an application for a driver's or commercial driver's license or identification card may be made the necessary equipment to take a photograph of the applicant for such license or card as required under section 4506.11 or 4507.06 of the Revised Code, and to conduct the vision screenings required by section 4507.12 of the Revised Code. The registrar shall assign one or more deputy registrars to any driver's license examining station operated under the supervision of the director of public safety, whenever the registrar considers such assignment possible. Space shall be provided in the driver's license examining station for any such deputy registrar so assigned. The deputy registrars shall not exercise the powers conferred by such sections upon the registrar, unless they are specifically authorized to exercise such powers by such sections. (C) No agent for any insurance company, writing automobile insurance, shall be appointed deputy registrar, and any such appointment is void. No deputy registrar shall in any manner solicit any form of automobile insurance, nor in any manner advise, suggest, or influence any licensee or applicant for license for or against any kind or type of automobile insurance, insurance company, or agent, nor have the deputy registrar's office directly connected with the office of any automobile insurance agent, nor impart any information furnished by any applicant for a license or identification card to any person, except the registrar. This division shall not apply to any nonprofit corporation appointed deputy registrar. (D) The registrar shall immediately remove a deputy registrar who violates the requirements of this chapter. Sec. 4507.06. (A)(1) Every application for a driver's license, motorcycle operator's license or endorsement, or motor-driven cycle or motor scooter license or endorsement, or duplicate of any such license or endorsement, shall be made upon the approved form furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles and shall be signed by the applicant. Every application shall state the following: (a) The applicant's name, date of birth, social security number if such has been assigned, sex, general description, including height, weight, color of hair, and eyes, residence address, including county of residence, duration of residence in this state, and country of citizenship; (b) Whether the applicant previously has been licensed as an operator, chauffeur, driver, commercial driver, or motorcycle operator and, if so, when, by what state, and whether such license is suspended or canceled at the present time and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension or cancellation; (c) Whether the applicant is now or ever has been afflicted with epilepsy, or whether the applicant now has any physical or mental disability or disease and, if so, the nature and extent of the disability or disease, giving the names and addresses of physicians, certified nurse-midwives if authorized as described in section 4723.438 of the Revised Code, clinical nurse specialists, or certified nurse practitioners then or previously in attendance upon the applicant; (d) Whether an applicant for a duplicate driver's license, duplicate license containing a motorcycle operator endorsement, or duplicate license containing a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter endorsement has pending a citation for violation of any motor vehicle law or ordinance, a description of any such citation pending, and the date of the citation; (e) If an applicant has not certified the applicant's willingness to make an anatomical gift under section 2108.05 of the Revised Code, whether the applicant wishes to certify willingness to make such an anatomical gift, which shall be given no consideration in the issuance of a license or endorsement; (f) Whether the applicant has executed a valid durable power of attorney for health care pursuant to sections 1337.11 to 1337.17 of the Revised Code or has executed a declaration governing the use or continuation, or the withholding or withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment pursuant to sections 2133.01 to 2133.15 of the Revised Code and, if the applicant has executed either type of instrument, whether the applicant wishes the applicant's license to indicate that the applicant has executed the instrument; (g) Whether the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States and, if the applicant is such, whether the applicant wishes the applicant's license to indicate that the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States by a military designation on the license; (h) Whether the applicant is a gold star family member and, if the applicant is such, whether the applicant wishes the applicant's license to indicate the gold star family symbol as described in section 4507.13 of the Revised Code. (2) Every applicant for a driver's license applying in person at a deputy registrar office shall be photographed at the time the application for the license is made. The application shall state any additional information that the registrar requires. (B) The registrar or a deputy registrar, in accordance with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall register as an elector any person who applies for a license or endorsement under division (A) of this section, or for a renewal or duplicate of the license or endorsement, if the applicant is eligible and wishes to be registered as an elector. The decision of an applicant whether to register as an elector shall be given no consideration in the decision of whether to issue the applicant a license or endorsement, or a renewal or duplicate. (C) The registrar or a deputy registrar, in accordance with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall offer the opportunity of completing a notice of change of residence or change of name to any applicant for a driver's license or endorsement under division (A) of this section, or for a renewal or duplicate of the license or endorsement, if the applicant is a registered elector who has changed the applicant's residence or name and has not filed such a notice. (D) In addition to any other information it contains, the approved form furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles for an application for a license or endorsement or an application for a duplicate of any such license or endorsement shall inform applicants that the applicant must present a copy of the applicant's DD-214 or an equivalent document in order to qualify to have the license or duplicate indicate that the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States based on a request made pursuant to division (A)(1)(g) of this section. Sec. 4507.13. (A)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles shall issue a driver's license to every person licensed as an operator of motor vehicles other than commercial motor vehicles. No person licensed as a commercial motor vehicle driver under Chapter 4506. of the Revised Code need procure a driver's license, but no person shall drive any commercial motor vehicle unless licensed as a commercial motor vehicle driver. (2) Every driver's license shall display all of the following information: (a) The distinguishing number assigned to the licensee; (b) The licensee's name and date of birth; (c) The licensee's residence address and county of residence; (d) A photograph of the licensee; (e) A brief description of the licensee for the purpose of identification; (f) A facsimile of the signature of the licensee as it appears on the application for the license; (g) A notation, in a manner prescribed by the registrar, indicating any condition described in division (D)(3) of section 4507.08 of the Revised Code to which the licensee is subject; (h) If the licensee has executed a durable power of attorney for health care or a declaration governing the use or continuation, or the withholding or withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment and has specified that the licensee wishes the license to indicate that the licensee has executed either type of instrument, any symbol chosen by the registrar to indicate that the licensee has executed either type of instrument; (i) If the licensee has specified that the licensee wishes the license to indicate that the licensee is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States and has presented a copy of the licensee's DD-214 form or an equivalent document, any symbol chosen by the registrar to indicate that the licensee is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States; (j) If the licensee is a noncitizen of the United States, a notation designating that the licensee is a noncitizen; (k) If the licensee has specified that the licensee wishes the license to indicate that the licensee is a gold star family member and has presented any documentation the registrar may require by rule, the gold star family symbol. As used in this division, "gold star family symbol" means a symbol inscribed on a license with a folded military burial flag, with golden stars, and the words "Gold Star Family" in a size and placement determined by the registrar; (l) Any additional information that the registrar requires by rule. (3) No license shall display the licensee's social security number unless the licensee specifically requests that the licensee's social security number be displayed on the license. If federal law requires the licensee's social security number to be displayed on the license, the social security number shall be displayed on the license notwithstanding this section. (4) The driver's license for licensees under twenty-one years of age shall have characteristics prescribed by the registrar distinguishing it from that issued to a licensee who is twenty-one years of age or older, except that a driver's license issued to a person who applies no more than thirty days before the applicant's twenty-first birthday shall have the characteristics of a license issued to a person who is twenty-one years of age or older. (5) The limited term license issued to a temporary resident shall contain the words "limited term" and shall have any additional characteristics prescribed by the registrar distinguishing it from a license issued to a resident. (6) Every driver's or commercial driver's license displaying a motorcycle operator's endorsement and every restricted license to operate a motor vehicle also shall display the designation "novice," if the endorsement or license is issued to a person who is eighteen years of age or older and previously has not been licensed to operate a motorcycle by this state or another jurisdiction recognized by this state. The "novice" designation shall be effective for one year after the date of issuance of the motorcycle operator's endorsement or license. (7) Each license issued under this section shall be of such material and so designed as to prevent its reproduction or alteration without ready detection. (B) Except in regard to a driver's license issued to a person who applies no more than thirty days before the applicant's twenty-first birthday, neither the registrar nor any deputy registrar shall issue a driver's license to anyone under twenty-one years of age that does not have the characteristics prescribed by the registrar distinguishing it from the driver's license issued to persons who are twenty-one years of age or older. (C) The registrar shall ensure that driver's licenses issued in accordance with the federal "Real ID Act," 49 U.S.C. 30301, et seq., comply with the regulations specified in 6 C.F.R. part 37. (D) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. Sec. 4507.51. (A)(1) Every application for an identification card or duplicate shall be made on an approved form furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles and shall be signed by the applicant. The application also shall be signed by the applicant's parent or guardian, or by the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services, as applicable, if the applicant is under eighteen years of age. Every application shall contain the following information: (a) The applicant's name, date of birth, sex, general description including the applicant's height, weight, hair color, and eye color, address, country of citizenship, and social security number. (b) If an applicant has not already certified the applicant's willingness to make an anatomical gift under section 2108.05 of the Revised Code, whether the applicant wishes to certify willingness to make such an anatomical gift and information about the requirements of sections 2108.01 to 2108.29 of the Revised Code that apply to persons who are less than eighteen years of age. The statement regarding willingness to make such a donation shall be given no consideration in the decision of whether to issue an identification card. (c) Whether the applicant has executed a valid durable power of attorney for health care pursuant to sections 1337.11 to 1337.17 of the Revised Code or has executed a declaration governing the use or continuation, or the withholding or withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment pursuant to sections 2133.01 to 2133.15 of the Revised Code and, if the applicant has executed either type of instrument, whether the applicant wishes the identification card issued to indicate that the applicant has executed the instrument. (d) Whether the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States and, if the applicant is such, whether the applicant wishes the identification card issued to indicate that the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States by a military designation on the identification card. (e) Whether the applicant is a gold star family member and, if the applicant is such, whether the applicant wishes the applicant's identification card to indicate the gold star family symbol as described in section 4507.52 of the Revised Code. (2) Each applicant applying in person at a deputy registrar office shall be photographed at the time of making an application. (3) The registrar or deputy registrar, in accordance with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall register as an elector any person who applies for an identification card or duplicate if the applicant is eligible and wishes to be registered as an elector. The decision of an applicant whether to register as an elector shall be given no consideration in the decision of whether to issue the applicant an identification card or duplicate. (4) The application shall be accompanied by any necessary documents, as required by the registrar. The registrar or the deputy registrar may authenticate the submitted documents and verify the information in the application. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section or section 4507.061 of the Revised Code, the application for an identification card or duplicate shall be filed in the office of the registrar or deputy registrar. Each applicant shall present documentary evidence as required by the registrar of the applicant's age and identity, and the applicant shall swear that all information given is true. All applications for an identification card or duplicate under this section shall be filed in duplicate, and if submitted to a deputy registrar, a copy shall be forwarded to the registrar. The registrar shall prescribe rules for the manner in which a deputy registrar is to file and maintain applications and other records. The registrar shall maintain a suitable, indexed record of all applications denied and cards issued or canceled. (2) The application for an identification card filed by either the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services on behalf of an individual in prison or in the department's custody shall be submitted through the process established by the registrar. The registrar shall establish the process for submission of such applications and the process for mailing the identification card to either the individual or the applicable department. (C) In addition to any other information it contains, the form furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles for an application for an identification card or duplicate shall inform applicants that the applicant must present a copy of the applicant's DD-214 or an equivalent document in order to qualify to have the card or duplicate indicate that the applicant is an honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States based on a request made pursuant to division (A)(2)(b) of this section. Sec. 4507.52. (A)(1) Each identification card issued by the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar shall display a distinguishing number assigned to the cardholder, and shall display the following inscription: "STATE OF OHIO IDENTIFICATION CARD This card is not valid for the purpose of operating a motor vehicle. It is provided solely for the purpose of establishing the identity of the bearer described on the card." (2) The identification card shall display substantially the same information as contained in the application and as described in division (A)(1) of section 4507.51 of the Revised Code, including, if the cardholder is a noncitizen of the United States, a notation designating that the cardholder is a noncitizen. The identification card shall not display the cardholder's social security number unless the cardholder specifically requests that the cardholder's social security number be displayed on the card. If federal law requires the cardholder's social security number to be displayed on the identification card, the social security number shall be displayed on the card notwithstanding this section. (3) The identification card also shall display the photograph of the cardholder. (4) If the cardholder has executed a durable power of attorney for health care or a declaration governing the use or continuation, or the withholding or withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment and has specified that the cardholder wishes the identification card to indicate that the cardholder has executed either type of instrument, the card also shall display any symbol chosen by the registrar to indicate that the cardholder has executed either type of instrument. (5) If the cardholder has specified that the cardholder wishes the identification card to indicate that the cardholder is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States and has presented a copy of the cardholder's DD-214 form or an equivalent document, the card also shall display any symbol chosen by the registrar to indicate that the cardholder is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States. (6) The card shall be designed as to prevent its reproduction or alteration without ready detection. (7) The identification card for persons under twenty-one years of age shall have characteristics prescribed by the registrar distinguishing it from that issued to a person who is twenty-one years of age or older, except that an identification card issued to a person who applies no more than thirty days before the applicant's twenty-first birthday shall have the characteristics of an identification card issued to a person who is twenty-one years of age or older. (8) Every identification card issued to a resident of this state shall display the expiration date of the card, in accordance with section 4507.501 of the Revised Code. (9) Every identification card issued to a temporary resident shall expire in accordance with section 4507.501 of the Revised Code and rules adopted by the registrar and is limited term. Every limited term identification card and limited term temporary identification card shall contain the words "limited term" and shall have any additional characteristics prescribed by the registrar distinguishing it from an identification card issued to a resident. (10) If the cardholder has specified that the cardholder wishes the identification card to indicate that the cardholder is a gold star family member and has presented any documentation the registrar may require by rule, the gold star family member symbol. As used in this division, "gold star family symbol" means a symbol inscribed on an identification card with a folded military burial flag, with golden stars, and the words "Gold Star Family" in a size and placement determined by the registrar. (B)(1) If a card is lost, destroyed, or mutilated, the person to whom the card was issued may obtain a duplicate by doing both of the following: (a) Furnishing suitable proof of the loss, destruction, or mutilation to the registrar or a deputy registrar; (b) Filing an application and presenting documentary evidence under section 4507.51 of the Revised Code. (2) A cardholder may apply to obtain a reprint of the cardholder's identification card through electronic means in accordance with section 4507.40 of the Revised Code. (3) A cardholder may obtain a replacement identification card that reflects any change of the cardholder's name by furnishing suitable proof of the change to the registrar or a deputy registrar. (4) Except as provided in division (B)(5) or (6) of this section, when a cardholder applies for a duplicate, reprint, or replacement identification card, the cardholder shall pay the following fees: (a) Two dollars and fifty cents; (b) A deputy registrar or service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code. (5) The following cardholders may apply for a duplicate, reprint, or replacement identification card without payment of any fee prescribed in division (B)(4) of this section: (a) A disabled veteran who has a service-connected disability rated at one hundred per cent by the veterans' administration; (b) A resident who is permanently or irreversibly disabled; (c) A resident who is in the custody of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services. (6) A cardholder who is seventeen years of age or older may apply for a replacement identification card without payment of any fee prescribed in division (B)(4) of this section. (7) A duplicate, reprint, or replacement identification card expires on the same date as the card it replaces. (C) The registrar shall cancel any card upon determining that the card was obtained unlawfully, issued in error, or was altered. (D)(1) No agent of the state or its political subdivisions shall condition the granting of any benefit, service, right, or privilege upon the possession by any person of an identification card. Nothing in this section shall preclude any publicly operated or franchised transit system from using an identification card for the purpose of granting benefits or services of the system. (2) No person shall be required to apply for, carry, or possess an identification card. (E) Except in regard to an identification card issued to a person who applies no more than thirty days before the applicant's twenty-first birthday, neither the registrar nor any deputy registrar shall issue an identification card to a person under twenty-one years of age that does not have the characteristics prescribed by the registrar distinguishing it from the identification card issued to persons who are twenty-one years of age or older. (F) The registrar shall ensure that identification cards issued in accordance with the federal "Real ID Act," 49 U.S.C. 30301, et seq., comply with the regulations specified in 6 C.F.R. part 37. (G) Whoever violates division (E) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. Section 2. That existing sections 4507.01, 4507.06, 4507.13, 4507.51, and 4507.52 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.